Mississippi, session 2026, SB2778.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 47-7-49, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 47-7-49.  (1)  Any offender on probation, parole, earned-release supervision, post-release supervision, earned probation or any other offender under the field supervision of the Community Services Division of the department shall pay to the department the sum of Fifty-five Dollars ($55.00) per month by certified check or money order unless a hardship waiver is granted.  An offender shall make the initial payment within sixty (60) days after being released from imprisonment unless a hardship waiver is granted.  A hardship waiver may be granted by the sentencing court or the Department of Corrections.  A hardship waiver may not be granted for a period of time exceeding ninety (90) days.  The commissioner or his designee shall deposit Fifty Dollars ($50.00) of each payment received into a special fund in the State Treasury, which is hereby created, to be known as the Community Service Revolving Fund.  Expenditures from this fund shall be made for:  (a) the establishment of restitution and satellite centers; and (b) the establishment, administration and operation of the department's Drug Identification Program and the intensive and field supervision program.  The Fifty Dollars ($50.00) may be used for salaries and to purchase equipment, supplies and vehicles to be used by the Community Services Division in the performance of its duties.  Expenditures for the purposes established in this section may be made from the fund upon requisition by the commissioner, or his designee. Of the remaining amount, Three Dollars ($3.00) of each payment shall be deposited into the Crime Victims' Compensation Fund created in Section 99-41-29, and Two Dollars ($2.00) shall be deposited into the Training Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 47-7-51. When a person is convicted of a felony in this state, in addition to any other sentence it may impose, the court may, in its discretion, order the offender to pay a state assessment not to exceed the greater of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or the maximum fine that may be imposed for the offense, into the Crime Victims' Compensation Fund created pursuant to Section 99-41-29. Any federal funds made available to the department for training or for training facilities, equipment or services shall be deposited into the Correctional Training Revolving Fund created in Section 47-7-51.  The funds deposited in this account shall be used to support an expansion of the department's training program to include the renovation of facilities for training purposes, purchase of equipment and contracting of training services with community colleges in the state. No offender shall be required to make this payment for a period of time longer than ten (10) years. (2)  The offender may be imprisoned until the payments are made if the offender is financially able to make the payments and the court in the county where the offender resides so finds, subject to the limitations hereinafter set out.  The offender shall not be imprisoned if the offender is financially unable to make the payments and so states to the court in writing, under oath, and the court so finds. (3)  An offender's responsibilities under this section may be satisfied by an offender's employer under Section 47-7-36.1(2). (4)  This section shall stand repealed from and after * * * June 30, 2026 July 1, 2030. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after June 30, 2026.